FULLXIP/parSem/xip/archive/simple.4/esperanto/GRAMMARS/ENGLISH/FST/src/lex-names.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# CONTENT:	First and last (person) names
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:	ENGLISH
!#
!# AUTHOR:	A. Schiller
!#
!# CREATED:	24-Mar-2006
!# ============================================================================
!# USAGE:	xfst -e "read lexc [ThisFile]" -l rules-new.xfst
!# ============================================================================
!#
!# SOURCES: 
!# [1]: old analyser (cf. old-roots.txt)
!# [2]: file pers_names.xfst 	(first and last names)
!# [3]: file pers1.xfst		(celebrities)
!# [4]: file pers2.xfst		(celebrities)
!# [5]: file additions.xfst

!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# NOTE:	some (rare) names have been commented (!!) 
!#	 	because of high ambiguity with common nouns
!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Multichar_Symbols
+Prop			! proper name

+PostMod		! post-modifier [not used]
+PreMod			! pre-modifier	(e.g. "los")
+Head			! head word  	[not used]


+FirstName		! first (given) name
+LastName		! last (family) name
+FullName		! full name
+Celeb			! famous people (history, fiction, ...)
+Masc +Fem +MF		! masculine, feminine or both
 
+Sg			! singular
+Pl			! plural
+Gen			! genitive/possessive 's

! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
! tag combinations:
!	+Prop +FirstName [+Fem|+Masc|+MF] [+Sg|+Pl] 	(+Gen)
!	+Prop +LastName	 (+Celeb) 	  [+Sg|+Pl] 	(+Gen)
!	+Prop +LastName  +PreMod
!	+Prop +FullName	 +Celeb [+Fem|+Masc] +Sg 	(+Gen)
!	
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------


! ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON GENSG		< %^GenSg >		#;
LEXICON GENPL		< %^GenPl >		#;

LEXICON optGENSG	#; GENSG;
LEXICON optGENPL	#; GENPL;

LEXICON N/SG		< %+Sg:0 >		optGENSG;
LEXICON N/PL		< %+Pl:0 >		optGENPL;
LEXICON N/SG+PLs				N/SG; 
			< 0:{+s} >		N/PL;

LEXICON PROP/SG		< %+Prop:0 >		N/SG;
!LEXICON PROP/PL		< %+Prop:0 >		N/PL;
LEXICON PROP		< %+Prop:0 >		N/SG+PLs;



!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!#  name modifiers
LEXICON PREMOD		< %+Prop:0 %+PreMod:0 >		#;
!LEXICON POSTMOD		< %+Prop:0 %+PostMod:0 >	#;

!LEXICON HEAD/SG		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/SG;
!LEXICON HEAD/PL		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/PL;
!LEXICON HEAD		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/SG+PLs;

LEXICON ROOT
den+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
der+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
vom+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
da+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
das+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
degli+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
auf+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
arap+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
dei+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
del+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
dell'+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
della+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
los+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
di+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
y+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
al+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
ben+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
dos+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
bin+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
bint+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
las+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
ait+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
abu+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
d'+LastName		PREMOD;	!	[5]
Achilles+FullName+Celeb+Masc			PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Afkham-ebrahimi+LastName			PROP;		
Al% Gore+FullName+Celeb+Masc			PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Alanis% Morissette+FullName+Celeb+Fem	PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Alec+FirstName+Masc				PROP;		
Alypius+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[3]
Anders% Celsius+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Anita+FirstName+Fem				PROP;		!#	[2]
Anne% Frank+FullName+Celeb+Fem		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Aretha% Franklin+FullName+Celeb+Fem		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Arigo+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[3]
Aristophanes+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Art+FirstName+Masc				PROP/SG;		
Attila+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[3]
Avraham% Stern+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Bader+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[3]
Barbee+FirstName+Fem				PROP;		
Barbet% Schroeder+FullName+Celeb+Fem	PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Baugh+LastName					PROP;		
Belva+FirstName+Fem				PROP;		
Berty+FirstName+MF				PROP;		
Bill% Gates+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Bittman+LastName				PROP;		
Blaise% Pascal+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Boileau-Despreaux+LastName+Celeb		PROP;		!#	[4]
Boucouris+LastName				PROP;		
Breault+LastName				PROP;		
Broussard+LastName				PROP;		
Buddha+FullName+Celeb+Masc			PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Bunny% Livingstone+FullName+Celeb+Masc	PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Burgundio+LastName+Celeb			PROP;		!#	[3]
Camella+FirstName+Fem				PROP;		
Carole% Lombard+FullName+Celeb+Fem		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Carpeaux+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[3]
Celinka+FirstName+Fem				PROP;		
Charlemagne+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Chavis+LastName					PROP;		
Chuai+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[3]
Cly+FirstName+Masc				PROP;		
Confucius+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Constantinides+LastName				PROP;		
Cousins+LastName				PROP;		
Cung+LastName					PROP;		
Cyprian+FullName+Celeb+Masc			PROP/SG;	!	=St. Cyprian	
Saint% Cyprian+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;
Damon% Hill+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Dangerfield+LastName+Celeb			PROP;		!#	[3]
Daniel% Gabriel% Fahrenheit+FullName+Celeb+Masc	PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Darth% Vader+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	Star Wars
Deak+LastName					PROP;		
Demsar+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[3]
Deng% Xiaoping+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Dickie+LastName					PROP;		
Diogenes+FullName+Celeb+Masc			PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Dionysius+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Don%_Juan+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#
Donald% Rumsfeld+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Donat+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[3]
Drummond+LastName				PROP;		
Earnhardt+LastName				PROP;		
Elfman+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[3]
Englund+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[3]
Epicureus+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Ettson+LastName					PROP;		
Ezekiel+FullName+Celeb+Masc			PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Saint% Fabian+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[2]
Farant+LastName					PROP;		
Fiallo+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[3]
Fobert+LastName					PROP;		
Françoise% Fabian+FullName+Celeb+Fem	PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Fredrick+FirstName+Masc				PROP;		!#	[2]
Gaiger+LastName					PROP;		
Gauthier+LastName				PROP;		
Gene% Kelly+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Giacobo+FirstName+Masc				PROP;		
Godin+LastName					PROP;		
Grace% Kelly+FullName+Celeb+Fem		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Gradnik+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[3]
Grunsfeld+LastName+Celeb			PROP;		!#	[3]
Gunter% Grass+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Haack+LastName					PROP;		
Hannibal+FullName+Celeb+Masc			PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Hanson+FirstName+Masc				PROP;		
Hayao+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[3]
Helena% Bonham% Carter+FullName+Celeb+Fem	PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Heraclonas+LastName+Celeb			PROP;		!#	[3]
Hindemith+LastName+Celeb			PROP;		!#	[3]
Hippocrates+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Ho% Chi% Min+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Hoon+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[3]
Howard% Stern+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Idi% Amin+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Irani+LastName					PROP;		
Isaac% Stern+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Jack% Frost+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[0]
Jackson% Pollock+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
James% Brown+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Jamnejad+LastName				PROP;		
Jean-Marie% Messier+FullName+Celeb+Masc	PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Jeralee+FirstName+Fem				PROP;		
Joan% of% Arc+FullName+Celeb+Fem		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Jodie% Foster+FullName+Celeb+Fem		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
John% Hurt+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
John% Savage+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Johnny% Rotten+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Kamminga+LastName				PROP;		
Kathleen% Turner+FullName+Celeb+Fem		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Kettie+FirstName+Fem				PROP;		
Koresh+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[3]
Lady% Di+FullName+Celeb+Fem			PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Lalo% Schifrin+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Lambregts+LastName				PROP;		
Leiker+LastName					PROP;		
Leni% Stern+FullName+Celeb+Fem		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Liverman+LastName				PROP;		
Lord% Liverpool+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Louis% Prima+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Loyd% C.% Stark+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Lynette+FirstName+Fem				PROP;		!#	[2]
Magic% Johnson+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Manilov+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[4]
Mao% Zedong+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Matsushita+LastName				PROP;		
Meaghan+FirstName+Fem				PROP;		
Mel% Brooks+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Menachem% Begin+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Mike% Stern+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Miltenburg+LastName				PROP;		
Mousson+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[4]
Nabokov+FullName+Celeb+Masc			PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Napoleon+FullName+Celeb+Masc			PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Neider+LastName					PROP;		
Neville% Chamberlain+FullName+Celeb+Masc	PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Nostradamus+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Nureyev+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[4]
OJ% Simpson+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Oliver% Hardy+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Osama% bin% Laden+FullName+Celeb+Masc	PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Owen+LastName					PROP;		
Peirce+LastName					PROP;		
Pericles+FullName+Celeb+Masc			PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Ploof+LastName					PROP;		
Plutarch+FullName+Celeb+Masc			PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Pol% Pot+FullName+Celeb+Masc			PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Pythagoras+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Ragde+LastName					PROP;		
Rhodes+LastName					PROP;		
Rossignol+LastName				PROP;		
Sampson+LastName				PROP;		
Samuel% Fuller+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Santa% Claus+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	
Schrumpf+LastName				PROP;		
Shelagh+FirstName+Fem				PROP;		
Sid% Vicious+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Skye+FirstName+MF				PROP;		
Socrates+FullName+Celeb+Masc			PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Sophocles+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Starkebaum+LastName				PROP;		
Stephen% Hawking+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Svankmajer+LastName+Celeb			PROP;		!#	[4]
Terrie+FirstName+Fem				PROP;		!#	[2]
Tiger% Woods+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Tilda% Swinton+FullName+Celeb+Fem		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Titus+FullName+Celeb+Masc			PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Tom% Petty+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Tostenson+LastName				PROP;		
Tutankhamen+FullName+Celeb+Masc			PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Tutankhamun+FullName+Celeb+Masc			PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Urso+LastName+Celeb				PROP;		!#	[4]
Vasco% Nuñez% de% Balboa+FullName+Celeb+Masc	PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Vina+FirstName+Fem				PROP;		
Weidenfeller+LastName				PROP;		
William% Hurt+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Wolff+LastName					PROP;		
Zechariah+FullName+Celeb+Masc		PROP/SG;	!#	[4]
Zelma+FirstName+Fem				PROP;		!#	[2]
